District of Columbia statutes.
15-702

Attorney fees taxed as costs.

An attorney for the District of Columbia may not retain attorney fees taxed as costs in litigation in which the District of Columbia is a party.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 531, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
June 19, 1986, 100 Stat. 633, Pub. L. 99-336, § 4(b)(2)
1981 Ed., § 15-702.
1973 Ed., § 15-702.